morphology/ex/arn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                   ! Nombre
%<cmp%>                 ! Composición


%>                      ! Frontera de morfema
%+                   
%#              


LEXICON Root 

Nouns  ; 

LEXICON Cmp

%<cmp%>%+:%# Nouns ;


LEXICON N
 
%<n%>:%> Cmp ;
%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON Nouns

mapu:mapu N ; !"tierra"
che:che N ; ! "gente"
mamüll:mamüll N ; ! "madera"
wangku:wangku N ; ! "silla"
